West Virginia, session 2026, SB298.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 7. Authorization for miscellaneous boards and agencies to promulgate legislative rules. §64-7-1. Racing Commission. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on July 22, 2025, authorized under the authority of §19-23-12e of this code, relating to the Racing Commission (Advance Deposit Account Wagering, 178 CSR 10), is authorized.